Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1513.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Subchapter E heading of Chapter 76 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:SUBCHAPTER EELECTRONIC MAIL AND WEBSITE MATERIALSection 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7662. Liability for Internet publishers and distributors of material harmful to minors.(a) Duty of commercial entities.--A commercial entity that knowingly and intentionally publishes or distributes material harmful to minors on the Internet from a website that contains a substantial portion of such material shall be held liable if the 1234567891011121314151617 entity fails to perform reasonable age verification measures to verify the age of individuals attempting to access the material.(b) Prohibited conduct.--A commercial entity described in subsection (a) or a third party that provides reasonable age verification measures under subsection (a) may not:(1) keep or retain the personal identifying information of an individual who accesses or views or attempts to access or view material harmful to minors; or(2) share the personal identifying information of an individual who accesses or views or attempts to access or view material harmful to minors with another person.(c) Recovery authorized.--A court of competent jurisdiction may award the following damages for a violation of subsection (a), when a minor accesses or views the material harmful to minors, or subsection (b):(1) Treble damages arising from the violation or $10,000, whichever is greater.(2) Reasonable attorney fees and court costs.(3) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from a continued violation of subsection (a).(4) Additional relief the court deems necessary and proper.(d) Exception.--An Internet service provider, affiliate or subsidiary of an Internet service provider, search engine or cloud service provider does not violate this section solely by providing access or connection to or from a website or other information or content on the Internet, or a facility, system or network not under that provider's control, including transmission, downloading, storing or providing access to the extent that the Internet service provider does not create the 20250HB1513PN1769 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 content of the communication that constitutes material harmful to minors.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial entity." A corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship or other legally recognized entity that:(1) is engaged in commerce in this Commonwealth; or(2) purposefully avails itself of the market of this Commonwealth or a portion of the market."Digital identification." Information stored on a digital network that may be accessed by a commercial entity and serves as proof of the identity of the individual."Distribute." To issue, sell, give, provide, deliver, transfer, transmute, circulate or disseminate by any means."Harmful to minors." As defined in section 5903(e)(6) (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances)."Minor." An individual who is under 18 years of age."Publish." To communicate or make information available to another individual or entity on a publicly accessible Internet website."Reasonable age verification measure." Technology that:(1) employs a system or process to determine whether it is more likely than not that a user attempting to access content on a website is an adult; and(2) prevents access by minors to any content that is harmful to minors."Substantial portion." More than 33 1/3% of total material 20250HB1513PN1769 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on a website, which meets the definition of "harmful to minors.""System or process." A process by which a user furnishes a copy of one or more of the following documents or information to verify the user's age:(1) government identity document, including a driver's license, military identification card, passport or certificate of naturalization;(2) digital identification;(3) bank account information; or(4) any other document that reliably and accurately establishes that a user attempting to access content on a website is an adult."Website." A collection of material placed in a computer server-based file archive so that the material is publicly accessible, over the Internet, using hypertext transfer protocol or any successor protocol.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1513PN1769 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617